Hawaii statutes.
[§349-25] Posting and distribution
of information. (a) The long-term care ombudsman shall provide each long-term
care facility with brochures and a poster with information regarding the office
of the long-term care ombudsman, including the name, address, and telephone
number of the office of the long-term care ombudsman, and a brief description
of the services provided by the office of the long-term care ombudsman.

(b) A long-term care facility shall provide
each resident of the long-term [care] facility with a copy of the brochure and
shall post the poster in a conspicuous location that is accessible to all
residents of the long-term care facility. [L 2007, c 93, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next